Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1502.4 Hawaii 3R's school
improvement fund. (a) There is established the Hawaii 3R's school
improvement fund (hereinafter, "fund") as a separate restricted fund
of Hawaii 3R's, a Hawaii nonprofit organization. Moneys received from the
State, county, or federal government, private contributions of cash or other
property, and the income and capital gains earned by the fund shall constitute
its assets.

(b) Hawaii 3R's shall expend moneys from the
fund in the form of either grants to organizations or contracts with private
vendors for the improvement of public schools and benefit of students in Hawaii
in accordance with this section.

(c) The fund may receive contributions,
grants, endowments, or gifts in cash or otherwise from all sources, including
corporations or other businesses, foundations, government, individuals, and
other interested parties. The fund shall also receive moneys transferred to it
from the school-level minor repairs and maintenance special fund established
under section 302A-1504.5. The legislature intends that public and private
sectors review and investigate all potential funding sources. The State may
appropriate moneys to the fund; provided that any appropriations made by the
State are not intended to supplant the funding of any existing programs.

(d) Chapter 103D shall not apply to
organizations or agencies that apply for grants or contracts under this
section; provided that Hawaii 3R's shall be held accountable for the use of the
funds under a contract with the department.

(e) The fund shall not be placed in the state
treasury, and the State shall not be liable for the operation or solvency of
the fund or Hawaii 3R's. [L 2003, c 214, §2; am L 2004, c 51, §54 and c 213, §3;
am L 2011, c 150, §2; am L 2012, c 133, §29; am L 2014, c 207, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next